vim/st.aff
FLAG long
SFX wT Y 78
SFX wT tre tre/ tre
SFX wT roître roissant/ croître
SFX wT roitre roissant/ croitre
SFX wT roître rû/ recroître
SFX wT roître rûs/ recroître
SFX wT roître rûe/ recroître
SFX wT roître rûes/ recroître
SFX wT roître ru/ décroître
SFX wT roître rus/ décroître
SFX wT roître rue/ décroître
SFX wT roître rues/ décroître
SFX wT roitre ru/ .croitre
SFX wT roitre rus/ .croitre
SFX wT roitre rue/ .croitre
SFX wT roitre rues/ .croitre
SFX wT roître rois/ .croître
SFX wT roître roît/ .croître
SFX wT roître roissons/ croître
SFX wT roître roissez/ croître
SFX wT roître roissent/ croître
SFX wT roitre rois/ .croitre
SFX wT roitre roit/ .croitre
SFX wT roitre roissons/ croitre
SFX wT roitre roissez/ croitre
SFX wT roitre roissent/ croitre
SFX wT roître roissais/ croître
SFX wT roître roissait/ croître
SFX wT roître roissions/ croître
SFX wT roître roissiez/ croître
SFX wT roître roissaient/ croître
SFX wT roitre roissais/ croitre
SFX wT roitre roissait/ croitre
SFX wT roitre roissions/ croitre
SFX wT roitre roissiez/ croitre
SFX wT roitre roissaient/ croitre
SFX wT roître rus/ .croître
SFX wT roître rut/ .croître
SFX wT roître rûmes/ croître
SFX wT roître rûtes/ croître
SFX wT roître rurent/ .croître
SFX wT roitre rus/ .croitre
SFX wT roitre rut/ .croitre
SFX wT roitre rûmes/ croitre
SFX wT roitre rûtes/ croitre
SFX wT roitre rurent/ .croitre
SFX wT tre trai/ tre
SFX wT tre tras/ tre
SFX wT tre tra/ tre
SFX wT tre trons/ tre
SFX wT tre trez/ tre
SFX wT tre tront/ tre
SFX wT tre trais/ tre
SFX wT tre trait/ tre
SFX wT tre trions/ tre
SFX wT tre triez/ tre
SFX wT tre traient/ tre
SFX wT roître roisse/ croître
SFX wT roître roisses/ croître
SFX wT roitre roisse/ croitre
SFX wT roitre roisses/ croitre
SFX wT roître russe/ .croître
SFX wT roître russes/ .croître
SFX wT roître rût/ croître
SFX wT roître russions/ .croître
SFX wT roître russiez/ .croître
SFX wT roître russent/ .croître
SFX wT roitre russe/ .croitre
SFX wT roitre russes/ .croitre
SFX wT roitre rût/ croitre
SFX wT roitre russions/ .croitre
SFX wT roitre russiez/ .croitre
SFX wT roitre russent/ .croitre
SFX wT roître rois/ .croître
SFX wT roître roissons/ croître
SFX wT roître roissez/ croître
SFX wT roitre rois/ .croitre
SFX wT roitre roissons/ croitre
SFX wT roitre roissez/ croitre

SFX wU Y 30
SFX wU roître rû/ croître
SFX wU roître rûs/ croître
SFX wU roître rûe/ croître
SFX wU roître rûes/ croître
SFX wU roitre rû/ croitre
SFX wU roitre rûs/ croitre
SFX wU roitre rûe/ croitre
SFX wU roitre rûes/ croitre
SFX wU roître roîs/ croître
SFX wU roître roît/ croître
SFX wU roitre roîs/ croitre
SFX wU roitre roît/ croitre
SFX wU roître rûs/ croître
SFX wU roître rût/ croître
SFX wU roître rûrent/ croître
SFX wU roitre rûs/ croitre
SFX wU roitre rût/ croitre
SFX wU roitre rûrent/ croitre
SFX wU roître rûsse/ croître
SFX wU roître rûsses/ croître
SFX wU roître rûssions/ croître
SFX wU roître rûssiez/ croître
SFX wU roître rûssent/ croître
SFX wU roitre rûsse/ croitre
SFX wU roitre rûsses/ croitre
SFX wU roitre rûssions/ croitre
SFX wU roitre rûssiez/ croitre
SFX wU roitre rûssent/ croitre
SFX wU roître roîs/ croître
SFX wU roitre roîs/ croitre

SFX wV Y 74
SFX wV tre tre/ tre
SFX wV croître croissant/ croître
SFX wV croitre croissant/ croitre
SFX wV croître cru/ croître
SFX wV croître crus/ croître
SFX wV croître crue/ croître
SFX wV croître crues/ croître
SFX wV croitre cru/ croitre
SFX wV croitre crus/ croitre
SFX wV croitre crue/ croitre
SFX wV croitre crues/ croitre
SFX wV croître crois/ croître
SFX wV croître croît/ croître
SFX wV croître croissons/ croître
SFX wV croître croissez/ croître
SFX wV croître croissent/ croître
SFX wV croitre crois/ croitre
SFX wV croitre croit/ croitre
SFX wV croitre croissons/ croitre
SFX wV croitre croissez/ croitre
SFX wV croitre croissent/ croitre
SFX wV croître croissais/ croître
SFX wV croître croissait/ croître
SFX wV croître croissions/ croître
SFX wV croître croissiez/ croître
SFX wV croître croissaient/ croître
SFX wV croitre croissais/ croitre
SFX wV croitre croissait/ croitre
SFX wV croitre croissions/ croitre
SFX wV croitre croissiez/ croitre
SFX wV croitre croissaient/ croitre
SFX wV croître crus/ croître
SFX wV croître crut/ croître
SFX wV croître crûmes/ croître
SFX wV croître crûtes/ croître
SFX wV croître crurent/ croître
SFX wV croitre crus/ croitre
SFX wV croitre crut/ croitre
SFX wV croitre crûmes/ croitre
SFX wV croitre crûtes/ croitre
SFX wV croitre crurent/ croitre
SFX wV tre trai/ tre
SFX wV tre tras/ tre
SFX wV tre tra/ tre
SFX wV tre trons/ tre
SFX wV tre trez/ tre
SFX wV tre tront/ tre
SFX wV tre trais/ tre
SFX wV tre trait/ tre
SFX wV tre trions/ tre
SFX wV tre triez/ tre
SFX wV tre traient/ tre
SFX wV croître croisse/ croître
SFX wV croître croisses/ croître
SFX wV croitre croisse/ croitre
SFX wV croitre croisses/ croitre
SFX wV croître crusse/ croître
SFX wV croître crusses/ croître
SFX wV croître crût/ croître
SFX wV croître crussions/ croître
SFX wV croître crussiez/ croître
SFX wV croître crussent/ croître
SFX wV croitre crusse/ croitre
SFX wV croitre crusses/ croitre
SFX wV croitre crût/ croitre
SFX wV croitre crussions/ croitre
SFX wV croitre crussiez/ croitre
SFX wV croitre crussent/ croitre
SFX wV croître crois/ croître
SFX wV croître croissons/ croître
SFX wV croître croissez/ croître
SFX wV croitre crois/ croitre
SFX wV croitre croissons/ croitre
SFX wV croitre croissez/ croitre

SFX xA Y 43
SFX xA roire roire/ croire
SFX xA roire royant/ croire
SFX xA roire ru/ croire
SFX xA roire rus/ croire
SFX xA roire rue/ croire
SFX xA roire rues/ croire
SFX xA roire rois/ croire
SFX xA roire roit/ croire
SFX xA roire royons/ croire
SFX xA roire royez/ croire
SFX xA roire roient/ croire
SFX xA roire royais/ croire
SFX xA roire royait/ croire
SFX xA roire royions/ croire
SFX xA roire royiez/ croire
SFX xA roire royaient/ croire
SFX xA roire rus/ croire
SFX xA roire rut/ croire
SFX xA roire rûmes/ croire
SFX xA roire rûtes/ croire
SFX xA roire rurent/ croire
SFX xA roire roirai/ croire
SFX xA roire roiras/ croire
SFX xA roire roira/ croire
SFX xA roire roirons/ croire
SFX xA roire roirez/ croire
SFX xA roire roiront/ croire
SFX xA roire roirais/ croire
SFX xA roire roirait/ croire
SFX xA roire roirions/ croire
SFX xA roire roiriez/ croire
SFX xA roire roiraient/ croire
SFX xA roire roie/ croire
SFX xA roire roies/ croire
SFX xA roire russe/ croire
SFX xA roire russes/ croire
SFX xA roire rût/ croire
SFX xA roire russions/ croire
SFX xA roire russiez/ croire
SFX xA roire russent/ croire
SFX xA roire rois/ croire
SFX xA roire royons/ croire
SFX xA roire royez/ croire

SFX xC Y 43
SFX xC oire oire/ boire
SFX xC oire uvant/ boire
SFX xC oire u/ boire
SFX xC oire us/ boire
SFX xC oire ue/ boire
SFX xC oire ues/ boire
SFX xC oire ois/ boire
SFX xC oire oit/ boire
SFX xC oire uvons/ boire
SFX xC oire uvez/ boire
SFX xC oire oivent/ boire
SFX xC oire uvais/ boire
SFX xC oire uvait/ boire
SFX xC oire uvions/ boire
SFX xC oire uviez/ boire
SFX xC oire uvaient/ boire
SFX xC oire us/ boire
SFX xC oire ut/ boire
SFX xC oire ûmes/ boire
SFX xC oire ûtes/ boire
SFX xC oire urent/ boire
SFX xC oire oirai/ boire
SFX xC oire oiras/ boire
SFX xC oire oira/ boire
SFX xC oire oirons/ boire
SFX xC oire oirez/ boire
SFX xC oire oiront/ boire
SFX xC oire oirais/ boire
SFX xC oire oirait/ boire
SFX xC oire oirions/ boire
SFX xC oire oiriez/ boire
SFX xC oire oiraient/ boire
SFX xC oire oive/ boire
SFX xC oire oives/ boire
SFX xC oire usse/ boire
SFX xC oire usses/ boire
SFX xC oire ût/ boire
SFX xC oire ussions/ boire
SFX xC oire ussiez/ boire
SFX xC oire ussent/ boire
SFX xC oire ois/ boire
SFX xC oire uvons/ boire
SFX xC oire uvez/ boire

SFX xJ Y 4
SFX xJ clure clure/ clure
SFX xJ clure clus/ clure
SFX xJ clure cluse/ clure
SFX xJ clure cluses/ clure
