vim/st.dic
accroitre/wV
accroître/wV
boire/xC
croire/xA
croitre/wTwU
croître/wTwU
décroitre/wT
décroître/wT
emboire/xC
mécroire/xA
reboire/xC
reclure/xJ
recroitre/wT
recroître/wT
